test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAL_gt-norm.yaml
     xadáal+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: xadáal
     xadáal+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáalga
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal
     xadáal+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáalgang
     xadáal+V+DIRECT+PAST: xadáalgan
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáalaa
     xadáal+V+INDIRECT+PAST: xadáalaan
     xadáal+V+RELATIVE: xadáals
     xadáal+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xadáalaas
     xadáal+V+NON_FACTIVE: xadáalang
     xadáal+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xadáalaa.ang
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáalgang
     xadáal+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáalganggang
     xadáal+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xadáalgangang
     xadáal+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáalgiinii
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáalgaangaa
     xadáal+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáalgaangaan
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xadáaläsaa
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xadáaläs
     xadáal+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xadáaläsaang
     xadáal+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xadáaläsga
     xadáal+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xadáaläsaas
     xadáal+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xadáaläsaa.ang
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asa'áa
     xadáal+V+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asa'áang
     xadáal+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asaasdláa
     xadáal+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asaasdláang
     xadáal+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáal'uuj
     xadáal+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'uujang
     xadáal+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: xadáaläsaa'uujang
     xadáal+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: xadáal'us
     xadáal+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáal'ujaa
     xadáal+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'uujaangaa
     xadáal+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: xadáaläsaa'us
     xadáal+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: xadáal'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+CERTAIN+PAST: xadáal'ahlanggan
     xadáal+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'ahlanggiinii
     xadáal+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: xadáaläsaa'ahlans
     xadáal+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: xadáal'ahlans
     xadáal+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: xadáalaa'ahlang
     xadáal+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: xadáalaa'ahlanggaa
     xadáal+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: xadáalaa'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+REFLEXIVE: xadáal'ahl
     xadáal+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: xadáaläseehl
     xadáal+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: xadáal'uu
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáal'waa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'waa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'waang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: xadáal'wägan
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáal'aawaa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: xadáal'aawaan
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: xadáal'waas
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xadáal'aawaas
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'waa.ang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'aawaa.ang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáalgang'waa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáalgang'waang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xadáalgang'waa.ang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'wägiinii
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'wägaangaa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'wägaangaan
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xadáal'waaäsaa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xadáal'waaäs
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xadáal'waaäsaang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xadáal'waaäsga
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xadáal'waaäsaas
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'waaäsaa.ang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáal'waa'uuj
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'waa'uujang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: xadáal'waaäsaa'uujang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: xadáal'waa'us
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáal'waa'ujaa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'waa'uujaangaa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: xadáal'waaäsaa'us
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: xadáal'waa'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: xadáal'waa'ahlanggan
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'waa'ahlanggiinii
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: xadáal'waaäsaa'ahlans
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: xadáal'waa'ahlans
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: xadáal'aawaa'ahlang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: xadáal'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: xadáal'aawaa'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: xadáal'waa'ahl
     xadáal+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: xadáal'waaäseehl
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: xadáal'ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáal'angga
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'anggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: xadáal'anggan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáal'aangaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: xadáal'aangaan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: xadáal'ans
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xadáal'aangaas
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'angang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'aangaa.ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáal'anggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáalgang'anggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xadáalgang'angang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'anggiinii
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'anggaangaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'anggaangaan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xadáal'angäsaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xadáal'angäs
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xadáal'angäsaang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xadáal'angäsga
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xadáal'angäsaas
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'angäsaa.ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asaa'áng
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asaa'ánggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáalang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'uuj
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'uujang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: xadáal'angäsaa'uujang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'us
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáal'ang'ujaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'ang'uujaangaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: xadáal'angäsaa'us
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: xadáal'aang'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: xadáal'aang'ahlanggan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'aang'ahlanggiinii
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: xadáal'angäsaa'ahlans
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: xadáal'aang'ahlans
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: xadáal'aangaa'ahlang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: xadáal'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: xadáal'aangaa'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: xadáal'aang'ahl
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: xadáal'angäseehl
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: xadáal'ang'uu
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'waa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'waa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'waang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: xadáal'ang'wägan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáal'ang'aawaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: xadáal'ang'aawaan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: xadáal'ang'waas
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: xadáal'ang'aawaas
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'ang'waa.ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'ang'aawaa.ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáalgang'ang'waa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: xadáalgang'ang'waang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: xadáalgang'ang'waa.ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'ang'wägiinii
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'ang'wägaangaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'ang'wägaangaan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: xadáal'ang'waaäsaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: xadáal'ang'waaäs
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: xadáal'ang'waaäsaang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: xadáal'ang'waaäsga
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: xadáal'ang'waaäsaas
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: xadáal'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: xadáal'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'waa'uuj
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'waa'uujang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: xadáal'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'waa'us
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: xadáal'ang'waa'ujaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: xadáal'ang'waaäsaa'us
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: xadáal'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: xadáal'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: xadáal'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: xadáal'ang'waa'ahlans
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: xadáal'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: xadáal'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: xadáal'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: xadáal'ang'waa'ahl
     xadáal+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: xadáal'ang'waaäseehl
